Utah statutes.
77-7-12.   Detaining persons suspected of shoplifting or library theft --
Persons authorized.
(1)  A peace officer, merchant, or merchant's employee, servant, or agent who
has reasonable grounds to believe that goods held or displayed for sale by the
merchant have been taken by a person with intent to steal may, for the purpose
of investigating the unlawful act and attempting to effect a recovery of the
goods, detain the person in a reasonable manner for a reasonable length of
time.
(2)  A peace officer or employee of a library may detain a person for the
purposes and under the limits of Subsection (1) if there are reasonable
grounds to believe the person violated Title 76, Chapter 6, Part 8, Library
Theft.
